South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S863.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Applied Baccalaureate in Culinary Arts Management degree authorized SECTION 1.    Section 59-103-15(B)(5)(e) and (f) of the S.C. Code are amended to read: (e) continue to remain technical, vocational, or occupational colleges with a mission as stated in item (4) and primarily focused on technical education and the economic development of the State; (f) subject to subsection (C), an Applied Baccalaureate in Advanced Manufacturing Technology degree approved first by the Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education and then the Commission on Higher Education; and (g) subject to subsection (C), an Applied Baccalaureate in Culinary Arts Management degree approved first by the Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education and then the Commission on Higher Education. Prohibition on use of new state funds SECTION 2.    Section 59-103-15(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Notwithstanding subsection (B), the degrees set forth in subsection (B)(3)(e), (f), (g), and (h), and subsection (B)(5)(f) and (g) are only allowed so long as new state general funds are not appropriated for the operations of the degree program. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________